trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 485 Y 5
SFX 485 0 k/188 . 224
SFX 485 0 k/188 . 224
SFX 485 0 kmA/188 . 224
SFX 485 0 km/188 . 224
SFX 485 0 kn/188 . 224
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 wA/175 . 252
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 wA/164 . 252
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 n/188 . 226
SFX 284 Y 1
SFX 284 0 At/191 . 251
SFX 454 Y 7
SFX 454 0 wh/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 whmA/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 whm/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 whA/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 whn/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 wny/162 . 249
SFX 454 0 wnA/162 . 249
SFX 67 Y 12
SFX 67 0 h/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 hmA/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 hm/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 hA/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 hn/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 k/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 k/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 kmA/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 km/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 kn/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 ny/161 . 258
SFX 67 0 nA/161 . 258
SFX 455 Y 5
SFX 455 0 wk/162 . 250
SFX 455 0 wk/162 . 250
SFX 455 0 wkmA/162 . 250
SFX 455 0 wkm/162 . 250
SFX 455 0 wkn/162 . 250
SFX 65 Y 12
SFX 65 0 wh/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 whmA/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 whm/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 whA/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 whn/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wk/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wk/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wkmA/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wkm/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wkn/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wny/161 . 259
SFX 65 0 wnA/161 . 259
SFX 160 Y 5
SFX 160 0 h/145 . 307
SFX 160 0 hmA/145 . 307
SFX 160 0 hm/145 . 307
SFX 160 0 hA/145 . 307
SFX 160 0 hn/145 . 307
SFX 522 Y 1
SFX 522 0 0/203 . 262
SFX 159 Y 7
SFX 159 0 wh/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 whmA/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 whm/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 whA/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 whn/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 wny/145 . 308
SFX 159 0 wnA/145 . 308
SFX 155 Y 7
SFX 155 0 h/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 hmA/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 hm/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 hA/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 hn/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 ny/145 . 310
SFX 155 0 nA/145 . 310
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 A/161 . 289
SFX 517 Y 7
SFX 517 0 h/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 hmA/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 hm/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 hA/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 hn/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 ny/163 . 257
SFX 517 0 nA/163 . 257
SFX 518 Y 5
SFX 518 0 k/163 . 224
SFX 518 0 k/163 . 224
SFX 518 0 kmA/163 . 224
SFX 518 0 km/163 . 224
SFX 518 0 kn/163 . 224
SFX 428 Y 7
SFX 428 0 h/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 hmA/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 hm/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 hA/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 hn/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 ny/169 . 276
SFX 428 0 nA/169 . 276
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 0/191 . 228
SFX 424 Y 7
SFX 424 0 h/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 hmA/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 hm/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 hA/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 hn/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 ny/152 . 276
SFX 424 0 nA/152 . 276
SFX 213 Y 12
SFX 213 0 Ath/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 AthmA/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Athm/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 AthA/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Athn/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Atk/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Atk/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 AtkmA/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Atkm/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Atkn/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 Aty/167 . 316
SFX 213 0 AtnA/167 . 316
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 A/161 . 292
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 yn/154 . 269
SFX 448 Y 7
SFX 448 0 wh/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 whmA/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 whm/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 whA/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 whn/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 wny/175 . 261
SFX 448 0 wnA/175 . 261
SFX 95 Y 1
SFX 95 0 A/145 . 319
SFX 436 Y 7
SFX 436 0 wh/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 whmA/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 whm/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 whA/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 whn/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 wny/164 . 261
SFX 436 0 wnA/164 . 261
SFX 449 Y 5
SFX 449 0 wk/175 . 263
SFX 449 0 wk/175 . 263
SFX 449 0 wkmA/175 . 263
SFX 449 0 wkm/175 . 263
SFX 449 0 wkn/175 . 263
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 y/145 . 291
SFX 437 Y 5
SFX 437 0 wk/164 . 263
SFX 437 0 wk/164 . 263
SFX 437 0 wkmA/164 . 263
SFX 437 0 wkm/164 . 263
SFX 437 0 wkn/164 . 263
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 wn/175 . 270
SFX 36 Y 13
SFX 36 0 y/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yh/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yhmA/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yhm/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yhA/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yhn/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yk/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 yk/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 ykmA/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 ykm/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 ykn/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 y/161 . 302
SFX 36 0 ynA/161 . 302
SFX 589 Y 5
SFX 589 0 h/194 . 234
SFX 589 0 hmA/194 . 234
SFX 589 0 hm/194 . 234
SFX 589 0 hA/194 . 234
SFX 589 0 hn/194 . 234
SFX 438 Y 1
SFX 438 0 wn/164 . 270
SFX 381 Y 1
SFX 381 0 wA/195 . 231
SFX 590 Y 5
SFX 590 0 k/194 . 236
SFX 590 0 k/194 . 236
SFX 590 0 kmA/194 . 236
SFX 590 0 km/194 . 236
SFX 590 0 kn/194 . 236
SFX 505 Y 7
SFX 505 0 Anh/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 AnhmA/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 Anhm/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 AnhA/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 Anhn/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 Anny/153 . 317
SFX 505 0 AnnA/153 . 317
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 yn/161 . 269
SFX 493 Y 7
SFX 493 0 Anh/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 AnhmA/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 Anhm/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 AnhA/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 Anhn/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 Anny/144 . 317
SFX 493 0 AnnA/144 . 317
SFX 506 Y 5
SFX 506 0 Ank/153 . 320
SFX 506 0 Ank/153 . 320
SFX 506 0 AnkmA/153 . 320
SFX 506 0 Ankm/153 . 320
SFX 506 0 Ankn/153 . 320
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 0 wA/160 . 231
SFX 494 Y 5
SFX 494 0 Ank/144 . 320
SFX 494 0 Ank/144 . 320
SFX 494 0 AnkmA/144 . 320
SFX 494 0 Ankm/144 . 320
SFX 494 0 Ankn/144 . 320
SFX 420 Y 7
SFX 420 0 h/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 hmA/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 hm/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 hA/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 hn/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 ny/201 . 276
SFX 420 0 nA/201 . 276
SFX 416 Y 7
SFX 416 0 h/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 hmA/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 hm/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 hA/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 hn/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 ny/173 . 276
SFX 416 0 nA/173 . 276
SFX 77 Y 5
SFX 77 0 k/161 . 293
SFX 77 0 k/161 . 293
SFX 77 0 kmA/161 . 293
SFX 77 0 km/161 . 293
SFX 77 0 kn/161 . 293
SFX 412 Y 7
SFX 412 0 h/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 hmA/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 hm/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 hA/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 hn/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 ny/168 . 257
SFX 412 0 nA/168 . 257
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 0/161 . 295
SFX 557 Y 5
SFX 557 0 h/187 . 234
SFX 557 0 hmA/187 . 234
SFX 557 0 hm/187 . 234
SFX 557 0 hA/187 . 234
SFX 557 0 hn/187 . 234
SFX 558 Y 5
SFX 558 0 k/187 . 236
SFX 558 0 k/187 . 236
SFX 558 0 kmA/187 . 236
SFX 558 0 km/187 . 236
SFX 558 0 kn/187 . 236
SFX 97 Y 13
SFX 97 0 A/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ah/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 AhmA/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ahm/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 AhA/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ahn/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ak/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ak/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 AkmA/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Akm/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Akn/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 Ay/145 . 241
SFX 97 0 AnA/145 . 241
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 p/145 . 242
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 An/145 . 245
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 y/145 . 284
SFX 54 Y 2
SFX 54 0 n/161 . 296
SFX 54 0 nA/161 . 296
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 At/145 . 251
SFX 382 Y 7
SFX 382 0 wh/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 whmA/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 whm/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 whA/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 whn/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 wny/195 . 249
SFX 382 0 wnA/195 . 249
SFX 58 Y 6
SFX 58 0 t/161 . 297
SFX 58 0 t/161 . 297
SFX 58 0 t/161 . 297
SFX 58 0 tmA/161 . 297
SFX 58 0 tm/161 . 297
SFX 58 0 tn/161 . 297
SFX 75 Y 5
SFX 75 0 h/161 . 321
SFX 75 0 hmA/161 . 321
SFX 75 0 hm/161 . 321
SFX 75 0 hA/161 . 321
SFX 75 0 hn/161 . 321
SFX 76 Y 5
SFX 76 0 h/161 . 322
SFX 76 0 hmA/161 . 322
SFX 76 0 hm/161 . 322
SFX 76 0 hA/161 . 322
SFX 76 0 hn/161 . 322
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 tyn/191 . 268
SFX 460 Y 7
SFX 460 0 wh/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 whmA/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 whm/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 whA/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 whn/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 wny/160 . 249
SFX 460 0 wnA/160 . 249
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 yn/167 . 260
SFX 461 Y 5
SFX 461 0 wk/160 . 250
SFX 461 0 wk/160 . 250
SFX 461 0 wkmA/160 . 250
SFX 461 0 wkm/160 . 250
SFX 461 0 wkn/160 . 250
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 0/161 . 298
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 tyn/178 . 268
SFX 571 Y 2
SFX 571 0 ny/184 . 230
SFX 571 0 nA/184 . 230
SFX 523 Y 7
SFX 523 0 h/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 hmA/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 hm/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 hA/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 hn/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 ny/203 . 257
SFX 523 0 nA/203 . 257
SFX 13 Y 13
SFX 13 0 0/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 h/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 hmA/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 hm/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 hA/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 hn/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 k/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 k/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 kmA/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 km/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 kn/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 y/161 . 300
SFX 13 0 nA/161 . 300
SFX 524 Y 5
SFX 524 0 k/203 . 224
SFX 524 0 k/203 . 224
SFX 524 0 kmA/203 . 224
SFX 524 0 km/203 . 224
SFX 524 0 kn/203 . 224
SFX 334 Y 2
SFX 334 0 ny/174 . 230
SFX 334 0 nA/174 . 230
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 0/174 . 228
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 |t/161 . 285
SFX 42 Y 13
SFX 42 0 ty/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyh/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyhmA/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyhm/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyhA/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyhn/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyk/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tyk/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tykmA/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tykm/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tykn/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 ty/161 . 312
SFX 42 0 tynA/161 . 312
SFX 394 Y 7
SFX 394 0 h/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 hmA/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 hm/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 hA/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 hn/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 ny/206 . 257
SFX 394 0 nA/206 . 257
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 wA/157 . 275
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 A/205 . 239
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 n/206 . 226
SFX 373 Y 7
SFX 373 0 wnh/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnhmA/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnhm/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnhA/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnhn/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnny/158 . 271
SFX 373 0 wnnA/158 . 271
SFX 414 Y 7
SFX 414 0 nh/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nhmA/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nhm/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nhA/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nhn/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nny/173 . 235
SFX 414 0 nnA/173 . 235
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 wA/193 . 231
SFX 61 Y 45
SFX 61 0 h/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 h/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 h/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 hn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 k/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 k/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 kmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 km/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 kn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 ny/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 ny/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAh/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAhmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAhm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAhA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAhn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAny/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mAnA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwh/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwhmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwhm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwhA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwhn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwny/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 mwnA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nh/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nhmA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nhm/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nhA/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nhn/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nny/161 . 225
SFX 61 0 nnA/161 . 225
SFX 361 Y 7
SFX 361 0 wnh/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnhmA/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnhm/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnhA/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnhn/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnny/149 . 271
SFX 361 0 wnnA/149 . 271
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 0 0/173 . 238
SFX 374 Y 5
SFX 374 0 wnk/158 . 272
SFX 374 0 wnk/158 . 272
SFX 374 0 wnkmA/158 . 272
SFX 374 0 wnkm/158 . 272
SFX 374 0 wnkn/158 . 272
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 0/161 . 314
SFX 362 Y 5
SFX 362 0 wnk/149 . 272
SFX 362 0 wnk/149 . 272
SFX 362 0 wnkmA/149 . 272
SFX 362 0 wnkm/149 . 272
SFX 362 0 wnkn/149 . 272
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 p/167 . 242
SFX 122 Y 13
SFX 122 0 y/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yh/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yhmA/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yhm/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yhA/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yhn/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yk/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 yk/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 ykmA/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 ykm/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 ykn/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 y/145 . 302
SFX 122 0 ynA/145 . 302
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 y/161 . 315
SFX 294 Y 12
SFX 294 0 h/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 hmA/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 hm/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 hA/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 hn/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 k/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 k/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 kmA/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 km/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 kn/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 ny/157 . 281
SFX 294 0 nA/157 . 281
SFX 162 Y 5
SFX 162 0 h/145 . 322
SFX 162 0 hmA/145 . 322
SFX 162 0 hm/145 . 322
SFX 162 0 hA/145 . 322
SFX 162 0 hn/145 . 322
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 y/161 . 323
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 y/167 . 284
SFX 577 Y 5
SFX 577 0 h/192 . 234
SFX 577 0 hmA/192 . 234
SFX 577 0 hm/192 . 234
SFX 577 0 hA/192 . 234
SFX 577 0 hn/192 . 234
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 yn/145 . 269
SFX 578 Y 5
SFX 578 0 k/192 . 236
SFX 578 0 k/192 . 236
SFX 578 0 kmA/192 . 236
SFX 578 0 km/192 . 236
SFX 578 0 kn/192 . 236
SFX 575 Y 2
SFX 575 0 ny/200 . 230
SFX 575 0 nA/200 . 230
